North Dakota statutes. TITLE 40 Municipal Government
CHAPTER 40-48 Municipal Master Plans and Planning Commissions
40-48-36.
Protest against resolution as a taking of property.

If any owner of property lying within any lines for the proposed opening and widening, or the opening and widening of any street, or between any future street line and the nearest public highway, shall claim that the adoption of any resolution or ordinance or the refusal to issue a building permit to the owner or the prohibition of building or construction by the owner shall constitute a taking of the owner’s property by the municipality, said owner, within three months after the recording in the office of the appropriate recorder of the notice provided in section 40-48-35, may file with the governing body a protest against the alleged taking of the owner’s property and a demand that the municipality adopting such resolution either vacate the same as to the property of such owner, or compensate the owner therefor, or commence the condemnation thereof within three months after the filing of the owner’s written protest and claim. If the municipality shall fail to vacate such resolution as to the property of the protesting owner, or to compensate the owner for the right to construct any building, fence, or other structure, or to commence proceedings for the condemnation thereof within three months after the receipt of such written protest and demand, such resolution shall be vacated automatically and annulled as to the property of such protesting owner.

Source:

S.L. 1929, ch. 177, § 24; R.C. 1943, § 40-4836; S.L. 2001, ch. 120, § 1.

40-48-37.
Failure to file claim is waiver.

Any owner of property lying within any of the lines set forth or described as future street lines in any resolution adopted as provided for in this chapter who shall fail, within the time specified, to file a protest and claim shall be deemed conclusively to have waived any such claim, but that person shall not be deemed to have waived any title to the property within any such future street line or lines or any interest therein other than the right to erect or construct thereon any building, fence, or other structure.

Source:

S.L. 1929, ch. 177, § 24; R.C. 1943, § 40-4837.

40-48-38.
Penalty for violations.

A person who violates any of the provisions of this chapter shall be guilty of a class A misdemeanor.

Source:

S.L. 1929, ch. 177, § 27; R.C. 1943, § 40-4838; S.L. 1975, ch. 106, § 456.

Cross-References.

Penalties for class A misdemeanor, see § 12.1-32-01.